Wyoming statutes. Title 11 Agriculture, Livestock and Other Animals
Article 2. Registration

§ 11-7-201.
Apiary
registration; procedure; information; conditions; penalties.

Any person who owns or possesses any class of apiary in this state shall register that apiary with the department before April 1 of each year.

Application for registration shall be made to the department on forms it prescribes and furnishes and shall include:

The applicant’s name and address;

The total number of colonies of bees the beekeeper owns;

The location of the apiary, setting forth specifically the location by sectional division to the nearest quarter section, the township and range and the latitude and longitude coordinates, or if within the corporate limits of a municipality, the number of the lot and block in the municipality including street address and the latitude and longitude coordinates determined using GPS. All new registrations shall include latitude and longitude coordinates. Effective July 1, 2012, latitude and longitude coordinates shall be required for all apiary registrations;

The name of the owner, renter or occupant of the land on which the apiary is located and, if the application is for an apiary being registered for the first time, it shall also show that the owner, renter or occupant of the land has consented to the apiary being located on his land;

The date the apiary was first established which shall be included for each location on yearly apiary renewal applications; and

The class of apiary registration for which application is being made.

Upon receipt of the application and payment of the fees, the department may issue a certificate of registration for an apiary, setting forth:

The name of the owner;

The specific location of the apiary; and

The class of apiary authorized.

In issuing certificates of registration for apiaries, if there is a conflict between applicants with respect to location, the department shall give preference to the applicant having the oldest, continuous apiary registration.

Certificates of registration shall not be issued for new apiaries which are within such close proximity to established registered apiaries that there is danger of spread of bee diseases, bee parasites or bee pests or that the proximity may interfere with the proper feeding and honey flow of established apiaries.

Each apiary registrant shall post in a conspicuous location at or near each apiary he owns legible evidence of registration, including his name and telephone number.

The department shall notify each registrant of his delinquency, if that registrant fails to reregister by April 1 of each year. The notification shall be by certified mail and is sufficient if deposited in a United States post office or mail box at least ten (10) days before May 1 and addressed to the registrant at his last address appearing in the department’s apiary registration files. Any apiary registration which has not been received by May 1 of each year is forfeited and all rights under the registration terminate.

Any person who owns or possesses any bees, hives, colonies or beekeeping equipment in this state or who owns or possesses an apiary in this state and who fails or refuses to register that apiary as provided in this chapter is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction thereof is subject to the penalties set forth in W.S.

11-7-133

.

Repealed by Laws 2010, ch. 14, § 3.

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 7, § 1; 2010, ch. 14, §§ 2, 3.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, in (b)(ii), inserted “total” and substituted “the beekeeper owns” for “hives and equipment in the apiary”; in (b)(iii), inserted “the latitude and longitude coordinates, or” and “and the latitude and longitude coordinates determined using GPS,” and added the last two sentences; inserted “which shall be included for each location on yearly apiary renewal applications” in (b)(v); substituted “bee diseases, bee parasites or bee pests” for “disease” in (e); and repealed former (j) which read: “Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as invalidating, canceling, amending, terminating or extending any certificate of registration the department issued prior to May 27, 1983. All certificates of registration issued prior to that date remain in effect, until January 31, 1984 subject to forfeiture, lapse, abandonment and termination in the manner provided by law.”

§ 11-7-202.
General
apiary registrations.

In order to control, limit and prevent the spread of bee diseases, bee parasites or bee pests among bees, hives and apiaries and to control, limit and prevent interference with proper feeding and honey flow of established apiaries, general apiaries registered to different persons shall be located at least two (2) miles apart, except as otherwise provided in this article. The department shall not register or issue a certificate of registration for any general apiary that is located less than two (2) miles from a general apiary registered to another person, except as otherwise provided in this section.

Any person may register a general apiary that is situated less than two (2) miles from another general apiary he has registered, if the location of the general apiary being applied for is at least two (2) miles from general apiaries registered to other persons.

A general apiary may be registered even though it is less than two (2) miles from any registered pollination apiary, landowner apiary or hobbyist apiary.

A person with an existing apiary that is located less than two (2) miles from an existing general apiary registered to another person may register his apiary as a general apiary under the following conditions:

His apiary is established and registered with the department as a general apiary under the department’s rules in effect prior to December 31, 2009; and

The registration of his apiary has not been forfeited or abandoned.

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 7, § 1; 2010, ch. 14, § 2.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, substituted “bee parasites or bee pests” for “and other contagious or infectious diseases” in (a); and substituted “December 31, 2009” for “May 27, 1983” in (d)(i).

§ 11-7-203.
Pollination apiary registrations.

The department may grant pollination apiary registrations to commercial seed and fruit producers or other commercial agricultural producers under the following conditions:

The applicant must own, lease or rent the land upon which the pollination apiary is to be located and the applicant must use the land for the purpose of growing a commercial seed, fruit or other crop which is dependent upon bees or other insects for pollination;

The applicant does not own the bees or the hives which are to be placed upon the pollination apiary;

The only purpose of the apiary is to pollinate a commercial agricultural crop;

The applicant shall provide the department with all pertinent information necessary to determine if pollination apiaries are needed to pollinate the applicant’s crop adequately;

The department may refuse to register a pollination apiary based upon its own investigation of the matter, but if the department approves the application, it shall specify the number of hives and location of pollination apiaries needed for the purpose of pollinating the applicant’s commercial agricultural crop adequately; and

A copy of the pollination contract between the seedgrower and beekeeper shall be sent to the department.

A pollination apiary registration is valid only for the time period the department specifies, and all pollination apiaries shall be removed within two (2) weeks after the end of the bloom period of the crop to be pollinated.

No certificate of registration of a pollination apiary may be leased, assigned or transferred and no person other than the pollination apiary registrant may exercise in any way any rights or privileges authorized by the certificate of registration.

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 7, § 1.

§ 11-7-204.
Landowner apiary registrations.

The department may grant landowner apiary registrations under the following conditions:

The applicant shall be a landowner, as defined in W.S. 11-7-131(a)(xiii) and shall own the land upon which the apiary will be located;

The applicant shall own the bees and the hives that will be placed on the apiary; and

The applicant shall personally manage and operate the bees and the hives.

No certificate of registration of a landowner apiary shall be leased, assigned or transferred and no person other than the landowner apiary registrant shall exercise in any way any rights or privileges authorized by the certificate of registration.

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 7, § 1.

§ 11-7-205.
Hobbyist
apiary registrations.

The department may grant hobbyist apiary registrations to hobbyist beekeepers under the following conditions:

The applicant shall not own a total of more than five (5) hives, and all of the hives must be placed on the hobbyist apiary;

The applicant shall own the bees and the hives and shall personally manage and operate the bees and the hives;

Only one (1) hobbyist registration is allowed an applicant and only two (2) hobbyist apiary registrations are allowed a family unit; and

If the department determines that too many hobbyist apiaries are being registered within too close proximity of each other or of other established apiaries so that there is danger of the spread of bee diseases, bee parasites or bee pests among bees or apiaries or that there will be interference with the proper feeding and honey flow of established apiaries, the department may refuse to grant any further hobbyist registrations in the locality and area of the danger.

No certificate of registration of a hobbyist apiary may be leased, assigned or transferred, and no person other than the hobbyist apiary registrant may exercise in any way any rights or privileges authorized by the certificate of registration.

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 7, § 1; 2010, ch. 14, § 2.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, substituted “bee parasites or bee pests” for “or other contagious or infectious diseases” in (a)(iv).

§ 11-7-206.
Restrictions on apiary locations.

Pollination apiaries,
landowner apiaries and hobbyist apiaries may be located less than
two (2) miles from pollination apiaries, landowner apiaries, hobbyist
apiaries and general apiaries registered to other persons. General
apiaries may be located within two (2) miles of one another only under
the provisions of W.S.

11-7-202

.

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 7, § 1.

§ 11-7-207.
Changing locations; enlarging or selling apiaries.

No owner of an established registered apiary shall change the location of the apiary without first receiving from the department authorization to establish the new apiary. In making the application, the owner shall specify the location of the apiary with the same particularity as in the application for original registration. If the new apiary is not used according to W.S.

11-7-211

, the certificate of registration lapses and all rights under the registration terminate. Registrations for new apiaries shall not be issued for greater areas than the applicant can show are reasonably necessary for his needs consistent with good beekeeping practice.

A registered apiary may be sold or transferred to a purchaser subject to applicable provisions of this chapter if all bees and equipment on the apiary are sold to the purchaser.

No person may increase the number of hives on an apiary to exceed the number of hives consistent with good beekeeping practices authorized by his certificate of registration for that apiary, except that a person may increase the number of hives on a general apiary beyond the number authorized by the certificate of registration in order to protect his bees and hives from bears or other predators. A person may also enlarge a general apiary during the spring buildup and in the fall after the end of the honey season in order to gather his bees for shipment out of the state or to winter his bees on that apiary.

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 7, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to normal buildup and honey producing season, see § 11-7-210(a).

§ 11-7-208.
New locations; evidence of owner's or manager's permission.

Any person registering
a new location for the first time shall have the approval signature
of the landowner or manager thereof indicating that the landowner
has given permission to place an apiary on his property.

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 7, § 1.

§ 11-7-209.
Minimum number of colonies.

All registered bee locations
must consist of not less than ten (10) colonies of bees during a minimum
of forty-five (45) or more continuous days during any part of normal
buildup or honey producing period of the year. This provision does
not apply to beekeepers who own a total of less than five (5) colonies
of bees registered in only one (1) apiary.

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 7, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to the normal buildup and honey producing season, see § 11-7-210(a).

§ 11-7-210.
Normal buildup and honey producing season; registration time; voiding
registration.

The normal buildup and honey producing season begins on May 1 and continues through September 30.

The regular registration time consists of the months of February through April.

The established way for voiding the registration of an apiary shall be initiated and completed by January 31 during the same registration year that the apiary was not in use.

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 7, § 1.

§ 11-7-211.
Forfeit of registration; termination of rights; disposition of equipment.

The registration of an apiary which is not stocked with bees during at least forty-five (45) continuous days of the normal buildup or honey producing season is forfeited and all rights under the certificate of registration terminate.

An apiary not regularly attended in accordance with good beekeeping practice, which comprises a hazard or threat to disease control in the beekeeping industry or which by reason of its physical condition or construction cannot be inspected, may be considered an abandoned apiary and may be seized by the department. Any diseased equipment or equipment which by reason of its physical condition or construction cannot be inspected may be burned, and any remaining equipment may be sold at public auction. Proceeds, after the cost of the sale is deducted, shall be returned to the former owner or his estate. Before burning or selling any equipment, the department shall give the owner or person in charge a written notice at least five (5) days before the burning or sale. The notice shall be given by certified mail or personal service upon the owner or person in charge of the property. If the owner or person in charge cannot be located, a certified letter sent to the owner’s last address registered with the department is sufficient notice under this section.

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 7, § 1.

§ 11-7-212.
Registration fees.

Each year before a certificate of registration may be issued for an apiary, the owner or applicant for the certificate shall pay the department a registration fee in the amount authorized by W.S.

11-1-104

, with the exception of those apiaries classified as hobbyist apiaries, which will be issued a nonfee certificate of registration.

through (xi) Repealed by Laws 1993, ch. 135, § 3.

Repealed by Laws 1993, ch. 135, § 3.

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 90, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

11-7-202

; 1993, ch. 135, §§ 2, 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section was enacted by Laws 1983, ch. 90, as §

11-7-202

, but it has been renumbered to conform to the revision of this chapter by Laws 1983, ch. 7.

§ 11-7-213.
Holding
yard apiary location.

The department may grant a certificate of registration for a temporary holding yard location to provide an area for holding hives prior to and after returning from pollination of a commercial agricultural crop in another state.

A temporary holding yard location shall not be used for planned honey production.

A general beekeeper shall provide the department location information for all temporary holding yard locations by designating the yard name and latitude and longitude coordinates which shall be included on the yearly renewal application and designated with “HY” for holding yard, as the authorized class.

A colony may be held at a temporary holding yard location for not more than two (2) months during the spring and for not more than two (2) months during the fall.

History.

Laws 2010, ch. 14, § 1.

§ 11-7-214.
Spray
yard apiary location.

The department may grant a certificate of registration for a spray yard apiary location to provide an area for holding hives during pesticide application to allow a safe haven for the health and safety of the bees.

A spray yard apiary location shall not be used for planned honey production.

Any hive shall not be held at a spray yard apiary location for more than sixteen (16) days after any pesticide application and the hive then shall be returned to the registered location.

A general beekeeper shall notify the department or the apiary inspector when hives are moved to spray yard apiary locations.

History.

Laws 2010, ch. 14, § 1.

§ 11-7-215.
Variance
agreements.

Upon request from a general beekeeper, the department may enter into a variance agreement with the general beekeeper because of drought conditions, crop rotation, conservation reserve program acres or other unforeseen circumstances adverse to a yard location.

Following a thorough investigation of each request under subsection (a) of this section, the department shall determine whether or not to enter into the requested variance agreement. If granted, a variance agreement shall contain an expiration date, after which the bees shall be returned to the original registered location. Failure to return the bees to the original registered apiary location shall cause that registered apiary location to be forfeited.

Signed copies of a variance agreement between a beekeeper and the department shall be on file in the department’s Cheyenne office and with the area apiary inspector and the beekeeper.

History.

Laws 2010, ch. 14, § 1.